Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-510
Warrants; payments; requirements.

(1) Warrants of a city of the metropolitan class shall be drawn by the city comptroller and shall be signed by the mayor and city comptroller and shall state the particular fund or appropriation to which such warrant is chargeable and the person to whom payable. Money of the city shall not be otherwise paid except in instances where it is otherwise specifically provided by law.

(2) A city of the metropolitan class may adopt by ordinance an imprest system of accounting for the city and authorize the establishment of an imprest vendor, payroll, or other account for the payment of city warrants in accordance with any guidelines issued by the Auditor of Public Accounts for county imprest accounts.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 9, p. 472;

C.S.1922, § 3633;

C.S.1929, § 14-510;

R.S.1943, § 14-510;

Laws 2001, LB 317, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 161.